District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.08

Partnership agreement; effect on partnership and person becoming partner; preformation agreement.

(a)

A person that becomes a partner of a partnership is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

(b)

A partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership itself has manifested assent to the agreement.

(c)

Two or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership the agreement will become the partnership agreement.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(2)(F), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.